District of Columbia statutes.
7-853

Health benefit plan reimbursement.

All health insurer health benefit plans shall reimburse for newborn hearing screenings conducted under this subchapter.

History

Apr. 4, 2001, D.C. Law 13-276, § 4, 48 DCR 1865

Section References

This section is referenced in § 7-855.

Editor's Notes

Section 7(b) of D.C. Law 13-276 provided: “(b) Section 4 shall apply to all health benefit plans issued or reissued beginning on the first day of the month 120 days following the effective date of this act.”